Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2002
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Legislative powers.

The Legislature shall have the power to amend or repeal all or part of the Business Corporation Act at any time and all domestic and foreign corporations subject to the act shall be governed by the amendment or repeal.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 2.